Maryland, session 2025, SB0349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
11–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following terms have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Court” means a court of law or a court of equity and includes the United
States District Court for the District of Maryland, the United States Bankruptcy Court for
the District of Maryland, the Supreme Court of Maryland, the Appellate Court of Maryland,
A CIRCUIT COURT OF A COUNTY OR BALTIMORE CITY, and the District Court of
Maryland.
– 1 –

Ch. 497 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) (1) “Money judgment” means a judgment determining that a specified
amount of money is immediately payable to the judgment creditor.
(2) “Money judgment” does not include a judgment mandating the payment
of money.
11–402.
(a) (1) In this section[, “land”] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “LAND” means real property or any interest in or appurtenant to real
property.
(3) “MEDICAL DEBT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 14–203.1 OF
THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(b) (1) A COMPLAINT SEEKING A MONEY JUDGMENT SHALL INDICATE
WHETHER THE JUDGMENT SOUGHT IS FOR MEDICAL DEBT.
(2) A COMPLAINT SEEKING A MONEY JUDGMENT FOR MEDICAL DEBT
SHALL INCLUDE THE ADDRESS OF THE PRIMARY RESIDENCE OF THE DEFENDANT.
(C) If indexed and recorded as prescribed by the Maryland Rules, a money
judgment of a court constitutes a lien to the amount and from the date of the judgment on
the judgment debtor’s interest in land located in the county in which the judgment was
rendered except:
(1) FOR a lease from year to year or for a term of not more than five years
and not renewable; AND
(2) AS PROVIDED IN § 14–203.1 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
[(c)] (D) If indexed and recorded as prescribed by the Maryland Rules, a money
judgment constitutes a lien on the judgment debtor’s interest in land located in a county
other than the county in which the judgment was originally entered, except:
(1) FOR a lease from year to year or for a term not more than five years
and not renewable; AND
(2) AS PROVIDED IN § 14–203.1 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE.
[(d)] (E) Promptly after the entry of an order of satisfaction or the filing of a
written statement by a judgment creditor with the clerk of the court that a judgment of a
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 497
court has been satisfied, the clerk of the court shall make an entry of the word “satisfied”
on the horizontal line in the judgment record where the lien is indexed.
Article – Real Property
7–105.1.
(a) (8) “Owner–occupied residential property” means residential property in
which at least one unit is occupied by an individual who:
(i) Has an ownership interest in the property; and
(ii) Uses the property as the individual’s primary residence.
14–203.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “MEDICAL DEBT” MEANS DEBT INCURRED DUE TO A
MEDICATION, PROCEDURE, OR SERVICE A DEBT OWED BY A CONSUMER TO A PERSON
WHOSE PRIMARY BUSINESS IS PROVIDING MEDICAL SERVICES, PRODUCTS, OR
DEVICES, OR TO THE PERSON’S AGENT OR ASSIGNEE, FOR THE PROVISION OF THE
MEDICAL SERVICES, PRODUCTS, OR DEVICES.
(II) “MEDICAL DEBT” DOES NOT INCLUDE DEBT CHARGED TO A
CREDIT CARD UNLESS THE CREDIT CARD IS ISSUED UNDER AN OPEN–END OR
CLOSED–END CREDIT PLAN OFFERED SOLELY FOR THE PAYMENT OF HEALTH CARE
SERVICES.
(3) “OWNER–OCCUPIED RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 7–105.1 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) A LIEN ON OWNER–OCCUPIED RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY MAY NOT BE
CREATED BY CONTRACT OR AS A RESULT OF A BREACH OF CONTRACT FOR THE
PAYMENT OF MEDICAL DEBT.
(C) IF A LIEN IS CREATED IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION, THE COURT:
(1) SHALL REMOVE THE LIEN; AND
(2) MAY AWARD TO THE OWNER OF THE PROPERTY ECONOMIC
DAMAGES SUFFERED AS A RESULT OF THE VIOLATION SHALL REMOVE THE LIEN.
– 3 –

Ch. 497 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any complaint filed before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 4 –